District of Columbia statutes.
33-103.05

Repealed

Partnership liable for partner’s actionable conduct.

Repealed.

Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-234, § 305, 44 DCR 777
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(x), 58 DCR 1720
1981 Ed., § 41-153.5.